Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 5 Wyoming Pipeline Authority and Wyoming Infrastructure Authority

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 83, § 3, provides that in addition to any other appropriation authorized by the legislature, the state treasurer is authorized to loan from the general fund to the Wyoming natural gas pipeline authority $284,600 for the payment of insurance costs and professional services. Monies loaned to the authority under this section are to be repaid, with interest at an annual rate set by the state loan and investment board of not more than four percent 4%, to the general fund at such time and manner as the authority determines it has sufficient revenues to repay the monies after operating expenses are met, but the funds are to be repaid in any event not later than June 30, 2010. A loan agreement will be prepared and approved by the attorney general before distribution of loan proceeds.

Loan. —

Laws 2003, ch. 171, § 4, authorizes the state treasurer to loan $279,500.00 from the general fund to the Wyoming natural gas pipeline authority for operating expenses of the authority, including expenses for staff hired by the authority. Monies loaned to the authority under this section are to be repaid, with interest at an annual rate set by the state loan and investment board of not more than four percent (4%), to the general fund at such time and manner as the authority determines it has sufficient revenues to repay the monies after operating expenses are met, but the funds are to be repaid in any event not later than June 30, 2008. A loan agreement is to be prepared and approved by the attorney general before distribution of loan proceeds.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 321, effective July 1, 2004, authorizes the state treasurer to loan $1,383,550 from the general fund to the Wyoming natural gas pipeline authority for operating expenses of the authority, including expenses for staff hired by the authority. Monies loaned to the authority under this section are to be repaid, with interest at an annual rate set by the state loan and investment board of not more than four percent (4%), to the general fund at such time and manner as the authority determines it has sufficient revenues to repay the monies after operating expenses are met, but the funds are to be repaid in any event not later than June 30, 2010. A loan agreement is to be prepared and approved by the attorney general before distribution of loan proceeds.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Deregulation of the Energy Industry,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1996).